Utah statutes.
53B-17-805.   Appointment and removal of director.

(1)  Subject to the advice and consent of the senior vice president for health sciences and after consultation with the individuals listed in Subsection (2), one of the following specified by the senior vice president for health sciences shall appoint and may remove the director:

(a)  the chair of the department within the university where the center resides; or

(b)  a designee of the senior vice president for health sciences.

(2)  The appointment or removal of the director under Subsection (1) may be made only after consultation with:

(a)  the senior vice president for academic affairs or the dean of the graduate school;

(b)  the dean of the school of medicine or the dean's designee;

(c)  the dean of the college of engineering or the dean's designee; and

(d)  the board through the board chair.



Enacted by Chapter 232, 2007 General Session

